Hawaii statutes.
§291-21.3 Definitions. As used
in this chapter:

"Flatrack" means an open-sided
platform mounted on a chassis without motive power designed to be drawn by a
motor vehicle and used to carry property.

"FMVSS" means the Federal Motor
Vehicle Safety Standards.

"Glazing material" means any glass,
plastic, or like material, manufactured for use in or on a vehicle, including
but not limited to windshields, window openings, or interior partitions.

"Light transmittance" means the ratio
of the amount of total visible light, expressed in percentages, which is
allowed to pass through the product or material, including the glazing
material, to the amount of total visible light falling on the product or
material and the glazing material.

"Sun screening devices" means
products or materials used or designed to be used in conjunction with glazing
materials for the purpose of reducing the effects of the sun, including, but
not limited to tinting films and perforated sun screening materials, but
excluding louvered materials. [L 1983, c 294, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 188, §1;
am L 1994, c 30, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next